test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s55_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - fara: # 
    fara+V+Inf: fara
    fara+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: fer
    fara+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: fór
    fara+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: fóru
    fara+V+Sup: farið
